Hawaii statutes.
§431:5-304 Loss reserves for liability and
workers' compensation insurance. The reserves for outstanding losses and
loss expenses under policies of liability insurance and workers' compensation
insurance shall be determined in accordance with the applicable basis set forth
in the convention annual statement blank of the National Association of
Insurance Commissioners. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next